Louisiana, session 2026, HB981.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1669 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1669. Law Enforcement Recruitment Incentive Program; Law Enforcement
Retention Incentive Program
A.(1) There is hereby created established in the state treasury, as a special
fund, the Law Enforcement Recruitment Incentive Fund, hereinafter hereafter
referred to in this Chapter as the "fund". Monies in the fund shall be used solely for
payments made in accordance with the Law Enforcement Recruitment Incentive
Program as provided in this Section.
(2) The Law Enforcement Retention Incentive Subfund is hereby established
in the state treasury as a subfund in the Law Enforcement Recruitment Incentive
Fund, hereafter referred to in this Section as the "subfund". Monies in the subfund
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1485 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 981
shall be used solely for payments made pursuant to the provisions of Subsection C
of this Section.
(3) After allocation of monies to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the fund or subfund monies transferred, appropriated, or dedicated
to the fund or subfund, respectively.
B. (4) Monies in the fund and subfund shall be invested in the same manner
as monies in the state general fund. Interest earned on investment of monies in the
fund and subfund shall be credited to the fund and subfund, respectively. Until the
termination of the program programs, unexpended and unencumbered monies in the
fund and subfund at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund and subfund,
respectively.
C. B. The Law Enforcement Recruitment Incentive Program, hereinafter
hereafter referred to in this Chapter Subsection as the "program", is hereby
established to aid in the recruitment of law enforcement officers within the state.
The purpose of the program is to provide one-time incentive payments of five
thousand dollars to certain newly employed law enforcement officers in the state.
D. (1) For purposes of this Section Subsection, the following terms shall
have the following meanings:
(1)(a) "Eligible agency" means a sheriff's office, municipal police
department, or the office of state police within the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections.
(2)(b) "Law enforcement officer" means an officer whose permanent duties
actually include the making of arrests, the performing of searches and seizures, or
the execution of criminal warrants, and who is responsible for the prevention or
detection of crime or for the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of
this state. "Law enforcement officer" shall not include any elected or appointed head
of a law enforcement department.
(3)(c) "Municipality" means an incorporated city, town, or village.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1485 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 981
(4)(d) "Newly employed officer" means a person who gains or is appointed
to full-time employment as a law enforcement officer with a Louisiana eligible
agency on or after July 1, 2023, and who has never before been employed as a law
enforcement officer in this state.
E. (2) To qualify for the incentive payment, a newly employed officer shall
meet the following criteria:
(1)(a) Attain POST-certification within one year of the date on which
employment begins.
(2)(b) Maintain continuous full-time employment with an eligible agency for
a least two years from the date on which employment begins. The required two-year
employment period may be satisfied by maintaining employment at one or more
eligible agencies, but such period shall not contain any break in service longer than
fifteen calendar days.
F.(1)(3)(a) An incentive payment made pursuant to this Section Subsection
shall be reimbursed by the officer who received payment to the state treasurer under
any of the following circumstances:
(a)(i) The officer voluntarily separates from employment with an employing
agency prior to completion of two years of employment, as provided in
Paragraph (E)(2) of this Section (2)(b) of this Subsection.
(b)(ii) The officer has a break in service of more than fifteen days.
(c)(iii) The officer is dismissed for cause by the employing agency.
(2)(b) The employing agency shall notify the treasurer if an officer who
received payment does not meet the required two-year employment period.
(3)(c) The treasurer shall send a determination letter to any officer who is
required to reimburse an incentive payment pursuant to this Subsection Paragraph
(3) of this Subsection to the officer's last-known mailing address. Reimbursement
of the incentive payment shall be made to the treasurer within twelve months of the
date on the determination letter.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1485 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 981
G.(1)(4)(a) Any request for an incentive payment for a deputy sheriff shall
be submitted by the sheriff of the respective parish to the Deputy Sheriff's
Supplemental Pay Board for review and approval. The board shall submit the
approved request to the state treasurer for payment. The treasurer shall remit
payments from the fund for deputy sheriffs to the sheriff's office of the respective
parish. The sheriff of each parish shall expend such funds solely for paying the
incentive payment.
(2)(b) Any request for an incentive payment for a municipal police officer
shall be submitted by the chief of police of the respective municipality to the
Supplemental Pay Board of Review for Municipal Police Officers for review and
approval. The board shall submit the approved request to the state treasurer for
payment. The treasurer shall remit payments from the fund for municipal police
officers to the police department of the respective municipality. The chief of police
of each municipality shall expend such funds solely for paying the incentive
payment.
(3)(c) Any request for an incentive payment for a law enforcement officer
employed by the office of state police shall be submitted pursuant to rules
promulgated by the State Police Commission. The treasurer shall remit payments
from the fund for the officer to the office of state police. The office of state police
shall expend such funds solely for paying the incentive payment.
(4)(d) Every request submitted pursuant to this Subsection the provisions of
Paragraph (4) of this Subsection shall include:
(a)(i) Certification from the submitting party that the newly employed officer
meets the eligibility criteria for receiving the incentive payment.
(b)(ii) A form signed by the newly employed officer acknowledging the
reimbursement requirements for failure to maintain eligibility.
H.(5) Payments shall be made on a first-come, first-served basis upon receipt
of the approved request of any entity as provided for in Subsection G of this Section
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1485 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 981
Paragraph (4) of this Subsection. Payments shall cease when all monies in the fund
have been expended.
I. (6) To the extent necessary, any local civil service system shall promulgate
rules for the effective implementation of this Section Subsection B of this Section
within its jurisdiction.
J. (7) The provisions of this Section Subsection B of this Section shall
terminate on July 1, 2027. Upon termination of the program, the treasurer is hereby
authorized and directed to transfer any unexpended and unencumbered monies in the
fund to the state general fund to the Law Enforcement Retention Incentive Subfund.
C. The Law Enforcement Retention Incentive Program, hereafter referred to
in this Subsection as the "program", is hereby established to aid in the retention of
law enforcement officers whose permanent duties include the making of arrests, the
performing of searches and seizures, the execution of criminal warrants, the
prevention or detection of crime, and the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or
highway laws of this state while employed by a public postsecondary education
institution. The qualifying law enforcement officers shall receive a monthly stipend,
payable from the Law Enforcement Retention Incentive Subfund, in the same
amount as paid to law enforcement officers as provided by R.S. 40:1667.1.
(1) To qualify for an incentive payment made pursuant to the provisions of
this Subsection, law enforcement officers shall meet the following criteria:
(a) Complete one year of employment as a full-time law enforcement officer
at a public postsecondary institution.
(b) Attain P.O.S.T. certification within one year from the date on which
employment begins.
(2) The monthly stipends provided pursuant to this Subsection shall be
disbursed upon the warrant by a public postsecondary institution drawn on the state
treasury. The warrant shall be approved and certified by the chief of police of a
public postsecondary institution. The warrant shall have attached to it the names of
the employees for whose benefit any particular warrant is drawn, together with the
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1485 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 981
completed years of service of the employees and any other information as required
by the state treasurer.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.